Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-701
Act, how cited.

Sections 42-701 to 42-751.01 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 727, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 43;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 1.